Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.038

State endemic mammal.

The Olympic marmot, Marmota olympus, is hereby designated as the official endemic mammal of the state of Washington.

[ 2009 c 464 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2009 c 464: "The legislature finds that the Olympic marmot, the only endemic mammal in Washington state, should be designated as the state endemic mammal. The Olympic marmot inhabits the Olympic Peninsula in the western section of the state of Washington. Olympic marmots hibernate from September to May. During the morning and afternoon on summer days they feed and spend time sunbathing on rocks. In the evening, they return to their burrow. Olympic marmots are relatively easy to see during the summer months along Hurricane Ridge in the Olympic National Park. Olympic marmots eat herbs, grasses, and flowers. They prefer plants that are soft and easy to digest. They may also eat fruits, legumes, and insects.

Olympic marmots are highly social and may live in groups of over a dozen animals. Gregarious bonds are made between individuals in a family. Olympic marmots identify each other by touching noses and smelling cheeks.

The legislature intends to promote awareness of the Olympic marmot by designating the Olympic marmot as the official endemic mammal of the state of Washington." [ 2009 c 464 s 1.]